Wisconsin, session 2025, SB772.
do enact as follows:SB772,13Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 4insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB772,25Section 2. 20.370 (4) (cf) of the statutes is created to read:SB772,2,9620.370 (4) (cf) Groundwater coordinating council. As a continuing 7appropriation from the general fund, the amounts in the schedule for activities of 8the department related to the groundwater coordinating council under ss. 15.347 9(13) and 160.50.SB772,310Section 3. Fiscal changes.SB772,2,1611(1) Groundwater Coordinating Council. In the schedule under s. 20.005 12(3) for the appropriation to the Board of Regents of the University of Wisconsin 13System under s. 20.285 (1) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased 14by $500,000 and the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $500,000 15for activities of the University of Wisconsin System related to the groundwater 16coordinating council under ss. 15.347 (13) and 160.50.SB772,2,1717